Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-226
State flood mitigation plan; scope.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall develop a state flood mitigation plan as a stand-alone document to be annexed into the state hazard mitigation plan maintained by the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency. Such plan shall be structured in accordance with Federal Emergency Management Agency guidelines, and shall be comprehensive, collaborative, and statewide in scope with opportunities for input from diverse stakeholders.

Laws 2020, LB632, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 343.